Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 88 Convention Center and Tourism Development Financing Act of 1998
7-88-114. Application.

This part shall apply to:

Tourism development zones existing as of April 27, 2018; and

Tourism development zones approved by the state building commission no later than December 31, 2018, that are created pursuant to a letter of intent or application filed as of June 26, 2007.

No tourism development zones shall be created after April 27, 2018, except for those tourism development zones created pursuant to subdivision (a)(2).

Should an application not be approved by the state building commission by December 31, 2018, whether or not it is filed pursuant to a letter of intent filed by June 26, 2007, the application and letter of intent shall be null and void.

The state building commission has the authority to approve or disapprove an application for a tourism development zone in whole or in part.

The state building commission has the authority to approve or disapprove any modification to a tourism development zone in whole or in part; however, a tourism development zone may not be modified to expand its boundaries or extend its term unless specifically authorized by statute with respect to a particular tourism development zone. The state building commission has the authority to deny a modification relative to the use of the tourism development zone funds if it determines that any proposed use is not economically feasible or not in the best interest of the state.

As used in this part, “modification” means any change in a tourism development zone, including, but not limited to, adding new qualified public use facilities; adding qualified associated developments or ancillary structures or facilities; or adding any use of property tax revenue pursuant to § 7-88-113.

The municipality or public authority in which a tourism development zone is located shall file with the commissioner of finance and administration and the state building commission an annual report on a form and in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury for the year previous to the date of the annual report, which shall include:

A list of contractual commitments specifying the individual parties, expenditures, and the scope of work. For the purpose of this part, “contractual commitment” means any contract, agreement, or commitment for goods or services that is funded in whole or in part by tourism development zone funds;

A tourism development zone's principal debt and interest, revenues, total expenditures, expenditures made with surplus funds, outstanding indebtedness, periodic surplus/deficit, and cumulative surplus/deficit;

The cumulative amount of funds expended by the tourism development zone on the zone itself specified by subaccount on each qualified public use facility, and specifying whether such funds were bond proceeds or surplus revenues; and

A sources and uses report showing all funds received or expended in conjunction with, in relation to, or leveraged with, tourism development zone funds. Received funds shall be stated separately from the funding source. Receipts or expenditures of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be reported in the aggregate by category. For receipts and expenditures equal to or in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), each item must be listed with specificity and include the payee or payees, purpose, and date.

In addition to the annual report, the state building commission shall have the authority to request at any time a sources and uses report showing all funds received or expended by the municipality or public authority with respect to the tourism development zone during the previous three (3) months.

Acts 2007, ch. 524, § 6; 2007, ch. 593, § 4; 2018, ch. 816, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 593, § 4 purported to enact this section, effective June 28, 2007. Acts 2007, ch. 524, § 6 enacted the same provisions, effective June 26, 2007. Because of the enactment by ch. 524, the provisions of ch. 593 were not given effect.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which formerly read: “This part shall only apply to tourism development zones that, as of June 26, 2007, either have already been approved by the state or for which a letter of intent has been filed with the commissioner of finance and administration.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 816, § 3. April 27, 2018.

7-88-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 2007, ch. 524, § 6; 2007, ch. 593, § 4; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 123, § 3, effective April 10, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-88-115 concerned monitoring and reporting of impact of the Convention Center and Tourism Development Financing Act of 1998.

7-88-116. Involvement of minority-owned business.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Covered qualified public use facility” means a qualified public use facility that elects to qualify as a qualified public use facility under § 7-88-103(7)(A)(ii) or (7)(A)(iii). “Covered qualified public use facility” also means a qualified public use facility created after January 1, 2007, in any county that does not have a metropolitan form of government;

“Local government” means a municipality that creates a tourism development zone for the benefit of a covered qualified public use facility;

“Minority-owned business” means a business that is solely owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by an individual who personally manages and controls the daily operations of the business and who is impeded from normal entry into the economic mainstream because of:

Past practices of discrimination based on race, religion, ethnic background, or sex;

A disability as defined in § 4-26-102; or

Past practices of racial discrimination against African Americans;

“Minority-owned business participation plan” means a business plan for actively soliciting bids from minority-owned businesses when a municipality or public authority proposes to finance, construct, lease, equip, renovate or acquire a qualified public use facility within a tourism development zone. Any such plan shall strive to maximize participation of minority-owned businesses through both prime and second tier business contracting opportunities throughout the tourism development zone and shall strive to achieve a level of minority-owned business participation representative of the population demographics of the county in which the tourism development zone is located; and

“Person” means any individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons.

Any person, in soliciting bids for the construction of a covered qualified public use facility in a tourist development zone within the territory of a local government and receiving any benefit, directly or indirectly, from public financing pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 524, shall actively solicit bids from minority-owned businesses. Such person shall strive to maximize participation of minority-owned businesses through both prime and second tier business contracting opportunities.

The local government shall monitor the results of minority-owned business participation. The local government shall periodically investigate to ascertain whether minority-owned business participation is being achieved at a level contemplated pursuant to subsection (b) and shall report the information to the comptroller of the treasury in the manner prescribed in subdivision (c)(2).

The local government shall prepare and submit an annual report entitled “The Conference and Convention Center Facilities Compliance Report,” which shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury. The report shall include:

Data on the race, religion, ethnic background and sex of each person employed in the construction of a covered qualified public use facility that is located within the territory of the local government and that receives any benefit, directly or indirectly, from public financing pursuant to the provisions Acts 2007, ch. 524;

Data on the actual expenditures to minority-owned businesses employed in the construction of any such qualified public use facility; and

Data summarizing the findings of all periodic investigations conducted in accordance with subdivision (c)(1).

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Notwithstanding § 7-88-108(a) or any other law to the contrary, to be entitled to receive the allocations of state and local sales and use taxes as provided in this chapter, a municipality or public authority must first file with the department of finance and administration an application seeking certification of the tourism development zone and the planned public use facility as a qualified public use facility. The application shall include a master development plan for the proposed tourism development zone, containing such information as may be reasonably required by the department, and a minority-owned business participation plan for the tourism development zone. No application shall be approved by the department that fails to include a master development plan or a minority-owned business participation plan. A master development plan shall be approved by the legislative body of the municipality creating the tourism development zone and the plan shall take into consideration any historic site, structure, or object listed on the national register of historic places. The department shall review the application to confirm that:

The planned public use facility is qualified under the requirements of this chapter;

The planned public use facility will be located within a qualified tourism development zone; and

The minority-owned business participation plan includes the following information:

The proposal for purchasing goods and services from minority-owned businesses;

Information on programs to provide technical assistance to such businesses;

A statement of intent to make a concerted effort to follow its minority-owned business participation plan; and

Any other information deemed relevant in the discretion of the commissioner.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the department of finance and administration shall annually review each municipality or public authority receiving an allocation pursuant to this chapter for compliance with the municipality's or public authority's minority-owned business participation plan.

This subsection (d) shall only apply to any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2007, ch. 524, § 6; 2007, ch. 593, §§ 6, 7; 2013, ch. 236, § 66; 2020, ch. 711, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted (c)(3), which read: “The comptroller of the treasury shall, upon receipt of the report from the local government, transmit a synopsis of the report to the chairs and membership of the state and local government committee of the senate and the local government committee of the house of representatives.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11. June 15, 2020.

7-88-117. Fee on sales of services and tangible personal property within central business improvement district within tourism development zone.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any metropolitan government which has created a tourism development zone pursuant to this chapter and which tourism development zone completely includes one (1) or more central business improvement districts, may, by resolution of its governing body, impose an additional fee on the sales price of services and tangible personal property sold at retail within one (1) central business improvement district located within the tourism development zone; provided, that there shall be exempt from the fee imposed by this chapter any sales of the following:

Professional services;

Lodging provided to transients;

Tickets to sporting events or other live ticketed events;

Alcoholic beverages which are subject to the liquor by the drink tax in addition to sales tax;

Newspapers and other publications; and

Overnight and long term parking.

The fee authorized by this section shall not exceed the rate of twenty-five hundredths percent (0.25%).

The metropolitan government shall furnish a certified copy of the adopting resolution to the department of revenue in accordance with regulations prescribed by the department. Such resolution shall clearly designate the one (1) central business improvement district within which the additional fee applies and shall include a description of the boundaries of such district.

The department of revenue shall collect such fee concurrently with the collection of the state sales tax in the same manner as the state sales tax is collected.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(4), the proceeds of the fee provided for in this section shall be distributed to the metropolitan government from which the fee was collected to be deposited into the event and marketing fund of such government. The funds derived from the collection of this fee shall be used to assist in the recruitment of major conventions and group meetings, the improvement of promotion, and to provide additional focused security in the central business improvement districts located within a tourism development zone. The funds derived from the collection of this fee shall not be used to assist in the recruitment of, directly or indirectly, conventions or group meetings which are considering, or would otherwise consider absent the use of this fee, other meeting and convention venues located in a county in which such fee is imposed.

For fiscal year 2013-2014, the first one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000) of the fee collected shall be deposited into the state general fund prior to any distribution to metropolitan government.

For fiscal year 2014-2015 and subsequent fiscal years, the first fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of the fee collected shall be deposited into the state general fund prior to any distribution to metropolitan government.

Acts 2013, ch. 347, § 1.